Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4806.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 811j. (1) A fund-raising plate or collector plate recognizing children's trust shall must be of a design as determined by the secretary of state after consultation with the state child abuse and neglect prevention children trust Michigan board created in section 3 of the child abuse and neglect prevention act, 1982 PA 250, MCL 722.603. (2) Fund-raising donations for plates recognizing children's trust collected under sections 811f and 811g shall must be transferred under section 811h by the secretary of state to the state treasurer, who shall credit the donation money to the children's trust fund created under section 1 of 1982 PA 249, MCL 21.171, for the support and benefit of the children of this state. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S03667'25) or House Bill No. 4807 (request no. H03667'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.